Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Chapter 13

Employees' Lien

66-13-101. Lien on business property.

All employees and laborers of any corporation, or firm, carrying on any corporate or partnership business shall have a lien upon the corporate or firm property of every character and description, for any sums due them for labor and service performed for the corporation or firm, and such lien shall prevail over all other liens, except the vendor's lien or the lien of a mortgage, or deed of trust to secure purchase money.

Acts 1883, ch. 18, § 1; 1897, ch. 78, § 1; Shan., § 3564; mod. Code 1932, § 7989; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1301.

Cross-References. Construction, fitting, or repair of boats, §§66-19-201 —66-19-210.

Enforcement of lien against personal property, §66-21-101.

Lien on crops, §§66-12-113 —66-12-115.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 471.

Law Reviews.

The Collection of Debts from Insolvent and Fully-Mortgaged Debtors (John A. Walker, Jr.), 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 399 (1976).

66-13-102. Duration.

The lien created in §66-13-101 shall only extend to and protect those claims as may have accrued within three (3) months of the bringing of any suit for the enforcement of the lien, and shall continue during the pendency of any suit brought for its enforcement.

Acts 1883, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; 1897, ch. 78, § 2; Shan., § 3565; mod. Code 1932, § 7990; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1302.

Law Reviews.

The Collection of Debts from Insolvent and Fully-Mortgaged Debtors (John A. Walker, Jr.), 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 399 (1976).

66-13-103. Priority over other liens.

No corporation or partnership doing business in this state shall have the power to execute a mortgage or deed of trust or other instrument creating a lien upon the property of the corporation prior to that in favor of the employees and laborers, except to secure purchase money.

Acts 1883, ch. 18, § 1; 1897, ch. 78, § 2; Shan., § 3566; mod. Code 1932, § 7991; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1303.

Cross-References. Lien against real estate for improvements, §§66-11-115 —66-11-140.